Louisiana, session 2026, SB261.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:167.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§167.1. Filing claim based upon a purchase agreement; requirements;
prohibitions; handling claim based upon a purchase agreement
A. In addition to the definitions provided in R.S. 9:153, the following
definitions shall apply to the provisions of this Section:
(1) "Executed" means a purchase agreement that is signed by all parties
or any amendment to a purchase agreement that is signed by all parties.
(2)"Purchase agreement" means a written document that transfers
ownership of unclaimed property of the seller that has been paid or delivered
to the administrator by a holder, whether it be by purchase, assignment, or any
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-532 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 261
other kind of transfer excluding an order by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(3)"Seller" means a person who sells, assigns, or otherwise transfers
unclaimed property that has been paid or delivered to the administrator by a
holder.
B.(1) Any purchase agreement that transfers ownership of unclaimed
property shall be limited to unclaimed property that has been paid or delivered
to the administrator by a holder as of the date the purchase agreement,
including any amendments, was executed.
(2) Any portion of a purchase agreement that transfers ownership of
unclaimed property that is paid or delivered to the administrator by a holder
after the date the purchase agreement is executed shall be null and void.
C. Any claim submitted to the administrator pursuant to the provisions
of this Section shall include an unredacted, executed copy of the purchase
agreement. Such purchase agreement shall include the following for each piece
of unclaimed property included in the purchase agreement:
(1) The property identifying number as found in the records of the
administrator.
(2) A certified search report from the clerk of court showing that no
other entity has a priority claim over the unclaimed property stated in the
purchase agreement.
(3) The full legal name of the seller.
(4) The social security number or taxpayer identification number of the
seller, if a number has been issued to the seller.
(5) The name and last known address, email address, and phone number
of the seller.
(6) Any name that the seller was formerly known by, and proof of the
name change.
(7) A copy of government-issued identification of the individual who
signed the purchase agreement on behalf of the seller.
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-532 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 261
(8) Documentation as required by the administrator evidencing the
individual who signed the purchase agreement on behalf of the seller had the
authority to do so.
(9) The name and last known address, email address, and phone number
of the individual who signed the purchase agreement on behalf of the seller.
(10) The names and federal identification numbers of any subsidiaries
or affiliates of the seller and proof that the seller has the right to sell, assign or
otherwise transfer the unclaimed property of these entities, if applicable.
D. The administrator shall determine whether sufficient evidence or
documentation is provided to meet the requirements of Subsection C of this
Section prior to paying a claim.
E. The administrator shall deny any claim of a person who asserts
ownership of unclaimed property through a purchase agreement if the purchase
agreement is not in compliance with the provisions of this Section.
F. The provisions of this Section shall apply to any purchase agreement
executed on or after January 1, 2027.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.